Maine, session 132, LD266.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 21-A MRSA §152, sub-§7 is enacted to read:
7. Signatures updated. Beginning January 1, 2026, a voter signature entered into the
central voter registration system is valid for 5 years from the time the signature was last
updated. The registrar in each municipality shall check the central voter registration system
annually and notify those voters whose signatures expire in that calendar year and provide
to those voters a voter signature registration update form prescribed by the Secretary of
State. The registrar shall update the central voter registration system with the updated
signatures pursuant to subsection 2.
Sec. 2. 21-A MRSA §161, sub-§6 is enacted to read:
6. Review and update signatures. Beginning January 1, 2026 and annually
thereafter, the registrar in each municipality shall review the central voter registration
system and notify those voters whose signatures expire during that calendar year. The
registrar shall provide to a voter whose signature expires in that year a voter signature
registration update form pursuant to section 152, subsection 7.